Colorado, session 2026A, HB1381.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-5.3-104, repeal (7);
and add (8) as follows:
13-5.3-104. Commission on judicial discipline special cash fund
- acceptance of federal funds - general appropriations - repeal.
(7) For the state fiscal year 2022-23, the general assembly shall
appropriate from the general fund to the fund four hundred thousand
dollars. In each subsequent fiscal year, the general assembly shall
appropriate sufficient money to the fund so that it begins the fiscal year with
not less than four hundred thousand dollars.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(8) (a) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
FOUR HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL
FUND.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (8) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1381

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1381